New York, session 2025-2026, S4847.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) Expenses not in excess of five hundred dollars actually incurred 4 and paid by eligible qualified personnel or an eligible service coordi- 5 nator for early intervention supplies, actually used and useful, to the 6 extent not deductible in determining federal adjusted gross income and 7 not reimbursed. For the purposes of this paragraph, the following terms 8 shall have the following meanings: 9 (i) "Qualified personnel" shall have the same meaning as subdivision 10 fifteen of section twenty-five hundred forty-one of the public health 11 law. 12 (ii) "Service coordinator" shall have the same meaning as subdivision 13 sixteen of section twenty-five hundred forty-one of the public health 14 law. 15 (iii) "Early intervention supplies" shall mean books, supplies, and 16 other equipment and supplemental materials used by eligible qualified 17 personnel or an eligible service coordinator in the furtherance of their 18 professional duties. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 20 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09556-01-5